New Mexico, session 2026, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 11-3A-9 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1994, Chapter 132, Section 9, as amended) is amended to read: "11-3A-9. NONPROFIT CORPORATIONS.--[Every] A. A regional housing authority, in addition to other powers conferred by the Regional Housing Law, shall have, if authorized by resolution of its board of commissioners, the power to create nonprofit corporations to carry out the powers and duties set forth in Section 11-3A-7 NMSA 1978. The articles of incorporation and bylaws, and any subsequent changes, shall be recommended for approval by the New Mexico mortgage finance authority. [Such] A nonprofit [corporations] corporation created pursuant to this section shall be subject to all of the duties and limitations imposed on the regional housing authority and its board of commissioners. B. A nonprofit corporation created pursuant to this section may enter into intergovernmental support agreements with the United States department of defense and its service branches pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Section 2679. The nonprofit corporation may carry out agreements related to activities, including leasing, developing, constructing, renovating, maintaining, repairing or managing property, inside or outside the geographic boundaries of New Mexico. C. Proceeds of activities described in Subsection B of this section shall support affordable housing objectives of the regional housing authority that created the nonprofit corporation." - 2 -